Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.080

Expenditures—Remittance of costs to counties.

Expenditures by the board shall be subject to the provisions of chapter 36.40 RCW and other statutes relating to expenditures by counties. The department of commerce shall on a quarterly basis remit to each county one-half of the actual costs incurred by the county for the operation of the boundary review board within individual counties as provided for in this chapter. However, in the event no funds are appropriated to the said agency for this purpose, this shall not in any way affect the operation of the boundary review board.

[ 2023 c 470 s 2022; 1995 c 399 s 44; 1985 c 6 s 7; 1969 ex.s. c 111 s 4; 1967 c 189 s 8.]

NOTES:

Explanatory statement—2023 c 470: See note following RCW 10.99.030.